Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
CHAPTER 3 Community Supervision and Transition

Effective date. —

This chapter became effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 42-3-1 through 42-3-32, and was based on Ga. L. 1960, p. 892, §§ 2-30, 32; Ga. L. 1964, p. 91, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1965, p. 591, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 810, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 864, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1970, p. 552, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 419; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 60; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 415, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 42.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this chapter, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).